Louisiana, session 2026, HB880.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 14 of Title 22 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 22:1401 through 1424, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1401. Short Title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Artificial
Intelligence Insurance Fairness Act" or the "LAIFA."
§1402. Legislative Findings and Purpose
A. The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) Artificial intelligence, machine learning, and algorithmic decision
systems are being rapidly deployed across the insurance industry to make decisions
about coverage eligibility, premium pricing, claims handling, and policy renewal.
Page 1 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(2) These algorithmic systems present significant risks of unfair
discrimination. Machine learning models trained on historical data inherit the biases
embedded in that historical data, including the effects of past discrimination in
housing, lending, insurance, and economic opportunity. When used in insurance
without adequate safeguards, such models can perpetuate and amplify discrimination
against communities protected under Louisiana and federal law.
(3) Black, Hispanic, Indigenous, and other minority communities,
communities with lower incomes, communities with older housing stock, and
communities located in historically redlined areas are particularly vulnerable to
disparate harm from algorithmic insurance practices.
(4) Louisiana's homeowners and small business owners within protected
classes, already facing a challenged insurance market, are at heightened risk of being
further disadvantaged by opaque algorithmic underwriting and pricing systems.
(5) Transparency in insurance decision-making is essential to enabling
consumers to understand and challenge decisions that affect their access to insurance
and their cost of coverage.
(6) The responsible use of artificial intelligence in insurance can reduce
costs, improve efficiency, and expand coverage if properly regulated. This Act is not
intended to prohibit the use of AI in insurance, but to ensure that such use is fair,
transparent, and accountable.
(7) Louisiana has a compelling interest in regulating the use of algorithmic
decision systems in insurance consistent with its longstanding prohibitions on unfair
discrimination in insurance practices.
B. The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish clear standards for the development, testing, and deployment
of AI systems used in insurance decisions;
(2) Require insurers to conduct and certify annual disparate impact audits of
algorithmic systems;
Page 2 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(3) Prohibit the use of variables that function as proxies for protected class
membership in ways that produce discriminatory outcomes;
(4) Ensure that consumers have access to meaningful explanations when
algorithmic systems are used in adverse insurance decisions;
(5) Establish a private right of action for individuals subjected to
discriminatory algorithmic insurance practices; and
(6) Position Louisiana as a national leader in the fair and responsible
regulation of AI in insurance.
§1403. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Adverse action" means a denial of insurance coverage, a cancellation
or nonrenewal of an insurance policy, an increase in premium or surcharge, a
reduction in coverage limits or benefits, or any other action by an insurer that is
materially unfavorable to an insurance consumer.
(2) "Algorithmic decision system" or "ADS" means any computational
process, including one derived from machine learning, artificial intelligence,
statistical modeling, or other data processing, that processes personal information to
generate a score, classification, recommendation, or decision that is used by an
insurer in making insurance decisions. The term includes both systems developed
by the insurer and third-party systems licensed or contracted by the insurer.
(3) "Artificial intelligence" means machine-based systems that use statistical
and computational methods to perform tasks that would otherwise require human
intelligence, including classification, prediction, recommendation, and
decisionmaking.
(4) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Insurance of the State of
Louisiana.
(5) "Consumer" means any individual who is an applicant for, policyholder
of, or claimant under an insurance policy regulated by this Act.
Page 3 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(6) "Covered insurer" means any insurer authorized to transact insurance in
Louisiana that uses an algorithmic decision system in connection with personal lines
homeowners insurance, commercial lines property and casualty insurance, personal
automobile insurance, commercial automobile insurance, health insurance, or life
insurance issued in Louisiana.
(7) "Disparate impact" means a materially adverse and statistically significant
difference in insurance outcomes, including denial rates, premium levels, or claims
payment rates, between consumers who are members of a protected class and
similarly situated consumers who are not members of that protected class.
(8) "Explainability" means the capacity of an insurer to provide a specific,
intelligible, and actionable explanation of the factors that most contributed to a
particular insurance decision made with the assistance of an algorithmic decision
system.
(9) "Input variable" means any data element or feature used as an input to
an algorithmic decision system.
(10) "Insurance decision" means any decision by a covered insurer regarding
underwriting, rating, policy issuance, renewal, cancellation, or claims handling.
(11) "Protected class" means any category of persons protected from
discrimination under applicable Louisiana or federal law, including but not limited
to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, familial status, and sexual
orientation.
(12) "Proxy variable" means an input variable that is not a protected class
characteristic itself but is statistically correlated with membership in a protected class
in a manner that causes or contributes to disparate impact on that protected class.
(13) "Third-party model" means an algorithmic decision system developed,
owned, or operated by a person other than the covered insurer, licensed or contracted
to the insurer for use in insurance decisions.
§1404. Scope and Applicability
Page 4 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
A. This Chapter applies to all covered insurers transacting insurance in
Louisiana.
B. The obligations imposed by this Chapter apply to:
(1) Algorithmic decision systems developed by the covered insurer;
(2) Third-party algorithmic decision systems used by the covered insurer;
and
(3) Hybrid systems combining algorithmic outputs with human underwriting
judgment.
C. The use of a third-party model does not relieve a covered insurer of any
obligation under this Chapter. Covered insurers shall contractually require third-
party model providers to supply the information and access necessary for the insurer
to fulfill its obligations under this Chapter.
D. This Chapter does not apply to:
(1) Basic actuarial calculations or rating factor applications that do not
involve machine learning or AI components;
(2) Fraud detection systems used exclusively to detect insurance fraud,
provided such systems are not used to influence coverage or pricing decisions for
consumers who are not suspected of fraud; or
(3) Internal administrative systems that do not affect insurance decisions
regarding consumers.
§1405. Fairness Standards
A. No covered insurer shall use an algorithmic decision system in a manner
that:
(1) Intentionally considers the protected class membership of any consumer
as an input variable;
(2) Uses input variables that are proxy variables for protected class
membership and that produce a disparate impact on a protected class, unless the
insurer demonstrates that each such variable is actuarially justified by sound actuarial
Page 5 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
principles and the least discriminatory alternative sufficient to achieve the actuarial
purpose; or
(3) Produces decisions that are arbitrary, capricious, or bear no rational
relationship to the risk of loss being assessed.
B. The following input variables are presumed to function as proxy variables
that may produce disparate impact and shall be subject to heightened scrutiny under
this Chapter:
(1) Credit scores or credit-based insurance scores used in personal
automobiel or homeowners insurance underwriting or rating;
(2) Geographic variables at the census tract, ZIP code, or neighborhood level
where those variables are correlated with the racial, ethnic, or national origin
composition of the area;
(3) Prior insurance coverage gaps or lapses, when used without adjustment
for demographic patterns in coverage gaps;
(4) Education or occupation variables;
(5) Social media data or online behavioral data; and
(6) Consumer purchasing patterns or retail transaction data.
C. Use of a presumptive proxy variable is not automatically prohibited, but
an insurer using such a variable bears the burden of demonstrating, in its disparate
impact audit required under Section 1407, that the variable does not produce a
statistically significant disparate impact on any protected class, or that the disparate
impact is justified by actuarial necessity and no less discriminatory alternative exists.
§1406. Governance Requirements for Algorithmic Systems
A. Each covered insurer that uses an algorithmic decision system shall adopt
written governance policies and procedures for the development, validation,
deployment, monitoring, and retirement of such systems. At a minimum, these
policies shall address:
(1) The roles and responsibilities of persons involved in developing,
validating, and overseeing algorithmic systems;
Page 6 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(2) testing requirements, including disparate impact testing before any new
or materially modified system is deployed;
(3) Ongoing monitoring requirements to detect model drift, performance
degradation, or emerging disparate impact;
(4) Procedures for investigating and remedying identified fairness issues;
(5) Documentation requirements to maintain records sufficient to
demonstrate compliance with this Chapter; and
(6) Escalation procedures for significant fairness concerns identified by staff.
B. Covered insurers shall designate a senior officer with responsibility for
AI governance and compliance with this Chapter.
C. Covered insurers shall train relevant staff on the requirements of this
Chapter and on the principles of fair and responsible AI use in insurance.
§1407. Disparate Impact Audits
A. Each covered insurer shall conduct an annual disparate impact audit of
each algorithmic decision system used in insurance decisions affecting Louisiana
consumers.
B. The disparate impact audit shall:
(1) Analyze insurance outcomes — including coverage denial rates,
premium levels, claims payment rates, and claims denial rates — disaggregated by
race, color, national origin, sex, age, disability status, and geographic area;
(2) Apply statistical testing appropriate to the size and nature of the insurer's
Louisiana book of business to determine whether disparate impact exists at a level
of statistical significance;
(3) Assess the contribution of each input variable to any identified disparate
impact;
(4) Evaluate whether less discriminatory alternatives exist that would
achieve the insurer's actuarial objectives with reduced disparate impact; and
(5) Document the methodology, findings, and any corrective actions taken
or planned.
Page 7 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
C. The disparate impact audit shall be conducted by a qualified independent
actuary or data scientist. An actuary conducting an audit under this section shall be
a Fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society, a Fellow of the Society of Actuaries, or
a Fellow of the American Academy of Actuaries. A data scientist conducting an
audit under this section shall have demonstrated expertise in algorithmic fairness
methods.
D. Where an insurer lacks sufficient Louisiana-specific data to conduct a
statistically reliable audit, the insurer shall use national data supplemented by
Louisiana-specific information to the extent available, and shall note this limitation
in the audit report.
E. Covered insurers shall file a Disparate Impact Audit Certification with the
Commissioner annually, no later than June 30 of each year. The certification shall
be signed by the insurer's senior AI governance officer and shall include:
(1) A summary of each algorithmic system audited;
(2) A statement of whether any disparate impact was identified;
(3) If disparate impact was identified, a description of the corrective actions
taken or a justification demonstrating actuarial necessity and absence of a less
discriminatory alternative; and
(4) A certification that the audit was conducted in accordance with this
section.
F. The Commissioner shall maintain a public registry of Disparate Impact
Audit Certifications, redacted of confidential proprietary information as provided in
Section 1413.
§1408. Prohibited Variables
A. Notwithstanding any actuarial justification, the following variables shall
not be used as input variables in algorithmic decision systems for homeowners
insurance underwriting or rating in Louisiana:
(1) Credit scores or credit-based insurance scores;
Page 8 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(2) Race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, age,
or sexual orientation of any consumer;
(3) Membership in any protected class as defined in this Chapter;
(4) Social media activity, social network connections, or online behavioral
data; and
(5) Consumer purchasing data from retail transactions.
B. For commercial lines insurance, use of the variables in subsection A(2)
and A(3) is prohibited. Use of other variables in subsection A may be permitted
upon demonstration to the Commissioner that the variable is actuarially justified and
does not produce disparate impact.
C. The Commissioner may, by rule, designate additional prohibited variables
based on evidence of disparate impact or the absence of actuarial justification.
§1409. Claims Adjustment AI Standards
A. No covered insurer shall use an algorithmic decision system to generate
a final claims payment determination without human review and approval of each
determination by a licensed claims professional.
B. The human reviewer of an AI-assisted claims determination shall:
(1) Have sufficient authority to override the algorithmic determination;
(2) Have access to the specific factors driving the algorithmic determination;
and
(3) Document the basis for approval, modification, or override of each
determination.
C. An insurer shall not use an algorithmic claims system to generate initial
settlement offers designed to be lower than the expected value of the claim with the
purpose of settling claims below their true value. Any algorithmic determination that
an insurer intends to use as a settlement offer shall be based on objective property
and liability valuation data.
Page 9 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
D. The Commissioner may conduct market conduct examinations of insurers'
AI claims systems to assess compliance with this section and the overall fairness of
claims outcomes by protected class.
§1410. Disclosure of AI Use
A. Every covered insurer shall disclose to consumers, at the time of
application, renewal, or any adverse action, whether an algorithmic decision system
was used in making the insurance decision affecting that consumer.
B. The disclosure shall be clear, conspicuous, and understandable to a
consumer without specialized knowledge, and shall appear in the following language
or substantially similar language:
"[Insurer name] uses automated or artificial intelligence systems to assist in
insurance decisions. Your [application/renewal/claim] has been processed using
such a system. You have the right to request an explanation of the factors that most
influenced this decision."
C. When a covered insurer interacts with a consumer through an automated
chatbot, virtual assistant, or similar automated system, the insurer shall clearly
disclose to the consumer at the beginning of the interaction that they are
communicating with an automated system and not a human representative.
§1411. Right to Explanation
A. Any consumer who is the subject of an adverse action involving the use
of an algorithmic decision system has the right to request, within thirty (30) days of
the adverse action, a written explanation of the decision.
B. Upon receipt of a request for explanation, the covered insurer shall, within
twenty-one (21) days, provide the consumer with:
(1) A clear statement of the nature of the adverse action;
(2) A plain language description of the top factors that most significantly
contributed to the adverse action, ranked in order of their relative contribution;
(3) A description of the data sources used in the decision;
(4) Information about the consumer's right to correct inaccurate data; and
Page 10 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(5) Information about the consumer's right to file a complaint with the
Commissioner and to seek a review of the decision.
C. The explanation required by this section shall be specific to the individual
consumer and shall not consist solely of generic descriptions of the algorithmic
system. The explanation shall be sufficiently specific to enable the consumer to
understand what, if anything, they could do differently to obtain a more favorable
outcome.
D. An insurer's assertion of trade secret protection for its algorithmic system
does not relieve the insurer of its obligation to provide consumer-specific
explanation under this section. The Commissioner shall by rule establish standards
for providing meaningful explanation while protecting legitimate trade secrets.
§1412. Right to Human Review
A. Any consumer who has received an adverse action based wholly or
substantially on the output of an algorithmic decision system may, within thirty (30)
days of receiving the adverse action notice or explanation, request human review of
the decision.
B. Upon receipt of a request for human review, the covered insurer shall:
(1) Assign a qualified human underwriter or claims professional to
independently review the decision;
(2) Complete the review and provide a written determination within thirty
(30) days of the request; and
(3) Provide the consumer with a written explanation of the human reviewer's
determination.
C. The human reviewer shall have full authority to modify or reverse the
original adverse action. The human reviewer's determination shall be based on the
specific facts of the consumer's situation and shall not be simply a reendorsement of
the algorithmic output.
§1413. Data Accuracy and Correction
Page 11 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
A. Each covered insurer shall maintain reasonable procedures to ensure the
accuracy of data used in algorithmic decision systems.
B. Any consumer has the right to:
(1) Request that the insurer identify the data sources used in making an
insurance decision affecting that consumer;
(2) Dispute the accuracy of data used in an adverse action; and
(3) Have inaccurate data corrected and the adverse action reconsidered.
C. Upon receipt of a dispute regarding data accuracy, the covered insurer
shall, within thirty (30) days, investigate the dispute and either correct the data and
reconsider the decision or notify the consumer of the insurer's determination that the
data is accurate.
§1414. Commissioner Authority and Rulemaking
A. The Commissioner shall have authority to promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement this Chapter, including rules governing:
(1) Standards for disparate impact audits, including acceptable
methodologies and statistical significance thresholds;
(2) The format and content of Disparate Impact Audit Certifications;
(3) Additional prohibited variables;
(4) Standards for AI governance policies;
(5) The format and content of consumer disclosures and explanations; and
(6) Procedures for market conduct examinations related to AI systems.
B. In promulgating rules under this Chapter, the Commissioner shall
consider guidance from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners,
National Council of Insurance Legislators, the Federal Trade Commission, and other
relevant regulatory bodies.
C. The Commissioner shall consult with the Louisiana Legislative Black
Caucus, consumer advocacy organizations, civil rights organizations, and
representatives of the insurance industry in developing rules under this Chapter.
§1415. Market Conduct Examinations
Page 12 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
A. The Commissioner may conduct market conduct examinations of covered
insurers to assess compliance with this Chapter.
B. As part of a market conduct examination, the Commissioner may require
a covered insurer to:
(1) Provide documentation of its AI governance policies and procedures;
(2) Provide access to its algorithmic decision systems and the data used by
those systems;
(3) Provide complete disparate impact audit reports, not merely the
certifications filed with the Commissioner; and
(4) Demonstrate the explainability of its algorithmic systems.
C. The Commissioner may retain independent actuarial, data science, or
technology experts to assist in market conduct examinations under this Chapter. The
reasonable costs of such experts shall be borne by the insurer being examined.
D. Market conduct examination reports relating to AI systems shall be
confidential to the extent necessary to protect legitimate trade secrets, but the
Commissioner shall publish aggregate findings of AI fairness examinations annually.
§1416. Filing Requirements for New AI Systems
A. At least sixty (60) days before deploying a new algorithmic decision
system, or a material modification of an existing system, a covered insurer shall file
with the Commissioner a notice that includes:
(1) A description of the system and its intended use;
(2) A summary of predeployment disparate impact testing results;
(3) A description of the data used to train and validate the system;
(4) A description of the input variables used; and
(5) A certification that the system complies with the requirements of this
Chapter.
B. The Commissioner may, within sixty (60) days of receiving a notice
under this section, request additional information or documentation from the insurer.
Deployment of the system shall be stayed pending the Commissioner's response if
Page 13 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
the Commissioner requests additional information within fifteen (15) days of the
notice.
C. The Commissioner may prohibit deployment of a system or require
modification of a system that the Commissioner determines does not comply with
this Chapter.
§1417. Annual Report on AI Insurance Fairness
A. The Commissioner shall prepare and publish an annual report on AI
Insurance Fairness in Louisiana. The report shall include:
(1) Aggregate findings from Disparate Impact Audit Certifications, including
the number of insurers reporting disparate impact and the steps taken to address
identified disparities;
(2) A summary of market conduct examination findings related to AI
systems;
(3) An analysis of insurance outcome data by race, color, and national origin
for homeowners and commercial lines;
(4) Recommendations for regulatory improvements; and
(5) An assessment of emerging AI technologies and their potential impact
on insurance fairness.
B. The Commissioner shall submit the annual report to the Legislature and
shall present findings to the House Committee on Insurance and the Senate
Committee on Insurance.
§1418. Civil Penalties
A. A covered insurer that violates any provision of this Chapter shall be
subject to a civil penalty as follows:
(1) For failure to conduct a required disparate impact audit: not less than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and not more than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) per violation;
Page 14 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(2) For failure to provide required disclosures or explanations to a consumer:
not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) per violation;
(3) For use of a prohibited variable under Section 1408: not less than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) and not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) per violation;
(4) For failure to conduct required human review of an adverse action: not
less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per violation; and
(5) For failure to file required certifications or notices: not less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per
day of violation.
B. In determining the amount of any civil penalty under this section, the
Commissioner shall consider:
(1) The severity of the violation and the extent to which consumers were
harmed;
(2) Whether the violation was knowing or willful;
(3) The insurer's history of compliance with this Chapter and other insurance
laws;
(4) The insurer's good faith efforts to correct the violation; and
(5) The financial size of the insurer
C. Civil penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the
Louisiana AI Insurance Fairness Fund established by Section 1421.
§1419. Private Right of Action
A. Any consumer who suffers harm as a result of a covered insurer's
violation of this Chapter shall have a private right of action against the insurer in a
court of competent jurisdiction in Louisiana.
B. A consumer who prevails in an action under this section shall be entitled
to:
Page 15 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(1) Actual damages, including any economic loss attributable to the adverse
action;
(2) Statutory damages of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not
more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, regardless of actual damages;
(3) Punitive damages, where the insurer's conduct was knowing, willful, or
reckless;
(4) Injunctive or declaratory relief; and
(5) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs
C. An action under this section shall be filed within two (2) years of the date
the consumer discovered or reasonably should have discovered the violation.
D. The filing of a complaint with the Commissioner shall toll the statute of
limitations for any related private action for the period during which the
Commissioner's investigation is pending.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require exhaustion of
administrative remedies before filing a private action.
§1420. Class Actions
A. A named plaintiff in a class action under this section need not show
individual actual damages as a prerequisite to maintaining the class action where the
claims are based on a systematic pattern of discriminatory algorithmic practice.
§1421. Louisiana AI Insurance Fairness Fund
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund to be known
as the Louisiana Artificial Intelligence Insurance Fairness Fund.
B. The fund shall receive civil penalties collected under this Chapter and
such other appropriations as the Legislature may provide.
C. Monies in the fund shall be used to:
(1) Fund the Commissioner's AI examination and oversight activities;
(2) Provide technical assistance and education to consumers regarding their
rights under this Chapter;
Page 16 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
(3) Provide grants to legal aid organizations for representation of consumers
in actions under this Chapter;
(4) Fund research on AI insurance fairness; and
(5) Cover administrative costs of the AI Fairness Advisory Board established
by Section 1422.
§1422. AI Insurance Fairness Advisory Board
A. The Commissioner shall establish an AI Insurance Fairness Advisory
Board to advise the Commissioner on the implementation and development of this
Chapter.
B. The Advisory Board shall consist of fifteen (15) members appointed by
the Commissioner, including:
(1) Three representatives of the insurance industry;
(2) Two consumer advocates;
(3) Two civil rights advocates, at least one of whom shall be nominated by
the Louisiana Legislative Black Caucus;
(4) Two representatives of minority business organizations;
(5) Two data scientists or AI fairness experts;
(6) One actuary;
(7) One legal scholar with expertise in anti-discrimination law;
(8) One representative from a Louisiana law enforcement or criminal justice
agency; and
(9) One member of the general public.
C. The Advisory Board shall meet at least quarterly and shall advise the
Commissioner on rules, examination priorities, and annual report findings.
§1423. Relation to Other Laws
A. This Chapter supplements and does not supersede existing state and
federal anti-discrimination laws applicable to insurance, including but not limited to
the federal Fair Housing Act, the Equal Credit Opportunity Act, and Louisiana's
unfair trade practices laws.
Page 17 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit or restrict the
Commissioner's existing authority to prohibit unfair discrimination in insurance
under Louisiana law.
C. Where any provision of this Chapter conflicts with a provision of another
state law, the provision that affords greater protection to consumers shall apply.
§1424. Severability
If any provision of this Chapter or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are severable.
§1425. Effective Date; Phased Implementation
A. This Act shall take effect January 1 of the year following its enactment.
B. The following provisions shall be implemented on a phased schedule:
(1) Section 1410 (AI disclosure requirements) and Section 1411 (right to
explanation) shall be effective six (6) months after enactment;
(2) Section 1407 (disparate impact audits) and Section 1416 (predeployment
filing) shall be effective twelve (12) months after enactment; and
(3) Section 1408 (prohibited variables) shall be effective eighteen (18)
months after enactment, to allow insurers time to modify their systems to comply.
C. The Commissioner shall publish implementing guidance and model
compliance frameworks for each phase of implementation at least ninety (90) days
before the effective date of each phase.
Page 18 of 20
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1284 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 880